Utah statutes.
36-27-104.   Issuance of resolution or written statement -- Reporting requirements.

(1) (a)  Any resolution or written statement that is issued under this chapter shall be sent to each United States senator representing Utah.

(b)  A copy of any resolution or written statement that is issued under this chapter shall be sent to each representative from the state serving in Congress.

(2)  Each resolution or written statement issued under this chapter shall specify that a United States senator shall provide the following to the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel when submitting a report in response to a resolution or written statement:

(a)  prior notice of any verbal response or report; or

(b)  a copy of any written response or report.

(3)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall maintain a record of:

(a)  any resolution or written statement issued under this chapter; and

(b)  each response and report provided to the Legislature by a United States senator in response to a resolution or written statement issued under this chapter.

